Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 66.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-245
Reciprocal license; provisions applicable.

The provisions of the Barber Act, relating to applications, transmittal of the names of eligible candidates, certification of successful applicants, and issuance of licenses thereto, in the case of regular examinations, apply as far as applicable to applicants for a reciprocal license or for a license issued without examination pursuant to section 71-239.01.

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 8;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 99;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 66.